New York, session 2025-2026, S1834.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 7326 of the education law, as added by chapter 987 2 of the laws of 1971, subdivisions e and f as added by chapter 994 of the 3 laws of 1971, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 7326. Exempt persons. This article shall not be construed to affect 5 or prevent: 6 a. The preparation of details and shop drawings by persons, other than 7 landscape architects, for use in connection with the execution of their 8 work; 9 b. Employees of those lawfully practicing as landscape architects 10 under the provisions of this article from acting under the instruction, 11 control or supervision of their employers; 12 c. Supervision by builders, or superintendents employed by such build- 13 ers, of the installation of landscape projects; [or] 14 d. Business conducted in this state by any agriculturist, horticultu- 15 rist, tree expert, arborist, forester, [nurseryman] employee of a nurs- 16 ery or [landscape nurseryman] employee of a nursery which grow trees and 17 shrubs for landscape purposes, gardener, landscape gardener, landscape 18 contractor, garden or lawn caretaker or grader or cultivator of land, as 19 these terms are generally used, except that no such person shall use the 20 designation landscape architect, landscape architectural or landscape 21 architecture unless licensed under this article[.]; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05312-02-6 S. 1834--A 2 1 e. Employment of any person as a junior or assistant landscape archi- 2 tect by the City of New York in a position the title of which was 3 approved and in use as of July first, nineteen hundred seventy-one, 4 provided such person acts under the general supervision of a licensed 5 landscape architect[.]; 6 f. Employment of any person as a junior or assistant landscape archi- 7 tect by the state of New York in a position the title of which was 8 approved and in use on or before the effective date of the chapter of 9 the laws of two thousand twenty-six that amended this subdivision, 10 provided that such person acts under the general supervision of a 11 licensed landscape architect; or 12 g. The practice of architecture by an architect licensed in this 13 state, or the practice of engineering or land surveying by an engineer 14 or land surveyor licensed in this state, provided that no such archi- 15 tect, engineer or land surveyor shall use the designation "landscape 16 architect," "landscape architectural" or "landscape architecture" unless 17 licensed as a landscape architect in this state. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.